Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.018

Obsolete funds and accounts—List provided to the office of financial management and legislative committees.

By October 31st of each odd-numbered year, the state treasurer shall provide to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a list of any funds or accounts in the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer that he or she believes to be obsolete. The list must include the standard or process the treasurer used to determine whether an account is believed to be obsolete.

[ 2010 c 222 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 222: See note following RCW 43.08.150.